apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
<pardef n="खा__v">
<e>       <p><l>ऊँ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="hon:mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>यो</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hon:lh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:यो"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ए</l>                                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hon:mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:ए"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छ</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hon:lh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="tam:न्छ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छु</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="hon:mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:न्छु"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छौ</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="hon:mh"/><s n="sp"/><s n="tam:न्छौ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छौँ</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="hon:mh"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:न्छौ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छन्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hon:mh"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:न्छन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>नुहुन्छ</l>                            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hon:hh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:नुहुन्छ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छिन्</l>                             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hon:mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:न्छिन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>नुभयो</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hon:hh"/><s n="sp"/><s n="tam:नुभयो"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ला</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hon:mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="tam:ला"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ली</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hon:mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:ली"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>नेछन्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hon:mh"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:नेछन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ई</l>                                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hon:lh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:ई"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="गर__v">
<e>       <p><l>्छ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्छ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्यो</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>्नेछ</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:नेछ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्नेछन्</l>                             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/><s n="tam:नेछन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्छिन्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:छिन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्छन्</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:छन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्ला</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="tam:ला"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्लान्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:लान्"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>




<pardef n="हु__v">
<e>       <p><l>हुन</l>                                 <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हुन</l>                                 <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>थियो</l>                                 <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<!--
<e>       <p><l>भयो</l>                                 <r>हु<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
-->
</pardef>



<pardef n="समाप्त_used_as__v">
<e>       <p><l><b/>गर्छ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l><b/>गर्छ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l><b/>गर्यो</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l><b/>गरे</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>





<!--

<pardef n="गर__v">
<e>       <p><l>्छ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="tam:छ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्नुहुन्छ</l>                           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sp"/><s n="tam:नुहुन्छ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्इछ</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:इछ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्ई</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:ई"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्नेछ</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:नेछ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्नेछन्</l>                             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/><s n="tam:नेछन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्छिन्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:छिन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्छन्</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:छन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्ला</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="tam:ला"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्लान्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:लान्"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

-->

    <!-- Proper names -->

<pardef n="राम__pn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="सीता__pn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

<pardef n="घर__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<!--
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
-->
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="एसियन__pn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r><s n="np"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>       
</pardef>

<pardef n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>




<pardef n="डोक/ो__n">
<e>       <p><l>ो</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ा</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="केट/ो__n">
<e>       <p><l>ो</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ा</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="केटी__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Pronouns -->

<e lm="काठ्माण्डौँ"><i>काठ्माण्डौँ</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="अलबानियन"><i>अलबानियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="अरब"><i>अरब</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="अर्जेनटिनियन"><i>अर्जेनटिनियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="एसियन"><i>एसियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="कातलान"><i>कातलान</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="क्याथोलिक"><i>क्याथोलिक</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="क्रिस्चियन"><i>क्रिस्चियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="युरोपियन"><i>युरोपियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="इन्डियन"><i>इन्डियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="कोरियन"><i>कोरियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="अभयमुद्रा"><i>अभयमुद्रा</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभयदान"><i>अभयदान</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिभव"><i>अभिभव</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिचार"><i>अभिचार</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिगमन"><i>अभिगमन</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिग्रहण"><i>अभिग्रहण</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिज्ञान"><i>अभिज्ञान</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिकल्पना"><i>अभिकल्पना</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिकथन"><i>अभिकथन</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिलाषा"><i>अभिलाषा</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अबला"><i>अबला</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभावपदार्थ"><i>अभावपदार्थ</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिवंदना"><i>अभिवंदना</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिव्यक्ति"><i>अभिव्यक्ति</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="आइमाई"><i>आइमाई</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="लट्टाई"><i>लट्टाई</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="घर"><i>घर</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="धोती"><i>धोती</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="बोतल"><i>बोतल</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="साथी"><i>साथी</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="कलम"><i>कलम</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="कोठा"><i>कोठ</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="मुसो"><i>मुस</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="केटो"><i>केट</i><par n="केट/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="केटी"><i>केटी</i><par n="केटी__n"/></e>
<e lm="ब्वाँसो"><i>ब्वाँस</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="चरो"><i>चर</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="सालो"><i>साल</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="हलो"><i>हल</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="घडी"><i>घडी</i><par n="केटी__n"/></e>
<e lm="हाँगो"><i>हाँग</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिधान"><i>अभिधान</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="एकाउन्टेन्ट"><i>एकाउन्टेन्ट</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="राजदूत"><i>राजदूत</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="सहायक"><i>सहायक</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="जीब वैज्ञानिक"><i>biologist</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="क्याप्टेन"><i>क्याप्टेन</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="बिरालो"><i>बिराल</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="साथी"><i>साथी</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="चालक"><i>चालक</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिजन"><i>अभिजन</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="देख"><i>देख</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="हेर"><i>हेर</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="मोइखा"><i>मोइखा</i><par n="खा__v"/></e>
<e lm="बिगार"><i>बिगार</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="समाप्त पार"><i>समाप्त पार</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="समाप्त पार"><i>समाप्त</i><par n="समाप्त_used_as__v"/></e>
<e lm="दुख दि"><i>दुख दि</i><par n="खा__v"/></e>
<e lm="गर"><i>गर</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="भन"><i>भन</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="खा"><i>खा</i><par n="खा__v"/></e>
<e lm="सुत"><i>सुत</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="हिँड"><i>हिँड</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="उठ"><i>उठ</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बस"><i>बस</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="लेख"><i>लेख</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="पढ"><i>पढ</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बोल"><i>बोल</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="सोध"><i>सोध</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="माग"><i>माग</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="डुल"><i>डुल</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="काट"><i>काट</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="मार"><i>मार</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="पिट"><i>पिट</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="चोर"><i>चोर</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="च्यात"><i>च्यात</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="फ्याल"><i>फ्याल</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="सुन"><i>सुन</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="गन"><i>गन</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="चढ"><i>चढ</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="खोल"><i>खोल</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बाँड"><i>बाँड</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बाँड"><i>चुँँड</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बाँड"><i>दगुर</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="बाँड"><i>पछार</i><par n="गर__v"/></e>
<e lm="हु"><par n="हु__v"/></e>
